Nebraska, session 109, LB520.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB520 LB520
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-2,242, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-2,242 Bed and breakfast establishment means a building originally
designed as, built as, or converted to a single-family dwelling unit that
provides sleeping accommodations and breakfast to transient guests for a
single fee. A bed and breakfast establishment does not include any
establishment that provides services at any given time to: (1) More than
ten guest rooms or (2) more than twenty guests. shall mean any place of
lodging that provides rented rooms to ten or fewer people, that is the
personal residence of the owner, that is occupied by the owner at the
time of rental, and in which the only meal served to renters is
breakfast.
Sec. 2. Section 81-2,292, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-2,292 (1) Except as provided in this section, the The Nebraska
Pure Food Act shall not apply to bed and breakfast establishments.
(2) Food served to guests by any bed and breakfast establishment
shall be clean, wholesome, free from spillage, free from adulteration,
free from misbranding, and safe for human consumption.
(3) Containers of food shall be stored above the floor, on clean
racks, shelves, or other clean surfaces in such a manner as to be
protected from splashes or other contamination.
(4) The only milk that shall be used is pasteurized Grade A milk.
(5) The use of home canned food is prohibited except for jams and
jellies.
(6) Food shall be protected from contamination while being stored,
prepared, served, and transported.
(7) Perishable foods shall be stored at a temperature that will
prevent spoilage. Potentially hazardous food shall be maintained at a
temperature of forty-five degrees Fahrenheit or colder or one hundred
forty degrees Fahrenheit or hotter, as appropriate, except during
-2-

LB520 LB520
2025 2025
necessary periods of preparation and serving. Frozen food shall be kept
at a temperature that will keep such food frozen, except when being
thawed for preparation. Potentially hazardous frozen food shall be thawed
at refrigeration temperatures or below, quick-thawed as part of the
cooking process, or thawed by another method approved by the department.
An indicating thermometer shall be located in each refrigerator. Raw
fruits and vegetables shall be washed thoroughly before use. Stuffings,
poultry, and pork products shall be cooked to heat all parts of the food
to at least one hundred sixty-five degrees Fahrenheit before being served
to a guest for consumption. Salads made of meat, poultry, potatoes, fish,
shellfish, or eggs and other potentially hazardous prepared food, shall
be prepared from chilled products with a minimum of manual contact.
Portions of food once served to an individual shall not be served again.
(8) Any person who prepares or serves food or washes utensils shall
wear clean outer garments and maintain a high degree of personal
cleanliness. Such person shall wash his or her hands thoroughly before
starting work and as often as necessary while working to remove soil and
contaminants. After visiting a toilet room, such person shall wash his or
her hands thoroughly in a lavatory, but never in the kitchen sink.
(9) No person shall use tobacco in any form while preparing or
serving food.
(10) Utensils shall be kept clean and in good repair.
(11) Multiuse eating and drinking utensils shall be thoroughly
cleaned after each use. Facilities needed for the operations of washing,
rinsing, and sanitizing shall be provided.
(12) Any person who knows that he or she is infected with a
communicable disease that is transmissible through the handling of food
shall not work in a bed and breakfast establishment.
(13) Laundry facilities shall be separated from food preparation
areas.
(14) Live animals shall be excluded from food preparation areas.
-3-

LB520 LB520
2025 2025
(15) Any operator of a bed and breakfast establishment shall be
certified to handle food. Such certification shall be achieved by
successfully completing an examination offered by the department.
Sec. 3. Section 81-503.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-503.01 (1) The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations constituting a State Fire Code. At a minimum, the
State Fire Code shall cover:
(a) The prevention of fires;
(b) The storage, sale, and use of flammable liquids, combustibles,
and fireworks;
(c) Electrical wiring and heating, protection equipment devices,
materials, furnishings, and other safeguards within structures necessary
to promote safety and reduce loss by fire;
(d) The means and adequacy of exits, in case of fire, in assembly,
educational, institutional, residential, mercantile, office, storage, and
industrial-type occupancies as such structures are defined in the State
Fire Code;
(e) All other buildings, structures, and enclosures in which numbers
of persons congregate from time to time for any purpose, whether
privately or publicly owned;
(f) Design, construction, location, installation, and operation of
equipment for storing, handling, and utilization of liquefied petroleum
gases, specifying the odorization of such gases and the degree thereof;
(g) Chemicals, prozylin plastics, X-ray nitrocellulose films, or any
other hazardous material that may now or hereafter exist;
(h) Tanks used for the storage of regulated substances pursuant to
the Petroleum Products and Hazardous Substances Storage and Handling Act;
and
(i) Accessibility standards and specifications adopted pursuant to
section 81-5,147; and .
-4-

LB520 LB520
2025 2025
(j) The provisions of section 4 of this act relating to bed and
breakfast establishments as defined in section 81-2,242.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2019, the rules and regulations adopted
and promulgated as part of the State Fire Code shall conform generally to
the standards recommended by the National Fire Protection Association,
Pamphlet Number 1, known as the Fire Code, 2012 edition, the National
Fire Protection Association, Pamphlet Number 101, known as the Life
Safety Code, 2012 edition, and associated pamphlets, but not when doing
so would impose an unduly severe or costly burden without substantially
contributing to the safety of persons or property.
(3) The State Fire Marshal shall enforce the State Fire Code through
inspections, code compliance, and orders. Plans for compliance with the
State Fire Code shall be reviewed by the State Fire Marshal. Plans
submitted after remodeling or construction has begun shall be accompanied
by a penalty of fifty dollars in addition to the plan review fee
established pursuant to subdivision (4)(a) of section 81-505.01.
(4) Rules and regulations adopted and promulgated as part of the
State Fire Code shall apply to sites or structures in public ownership
listed on the National Register of Historic Places but without destroying
the historic quality thereof.
Sec. 4. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Bed and breakfast establishment has the same meaning as in
section 81-2,242; and
(b) Sprinkler system means a device that opens automatically by
operation of a heat responsive releasing mechanism and discharges water
or another medium in a specific pattern over a designated area to
extinguish or control fire.
(2) Each bed and breakfast shall have operational smoke alarms and
heat detectors in all common areas, guest rooms, and hallways. Battery-
powered smoke alarms are permitted where the bed and breakfast
establishment has demonstrated that the testing, maintenance, and battery
-5-

LB520 LB520
2025 2025
replacement procedures will ensure reliable power to the smoke alarms.
(3) Smoking is prohibited inside a bed and breakfast establishment.
(4) Each bed and breakfast shall have operational hard-wired,
battery-powered, or plug-in emergency lighting that indicates available
means of egress. Battery-powered or plug-in emergency lighting devices
are permitted where the establishment has demonstrated that the testing,
maintenance, and battery replacement procedures will ensure reliable
power to the emergency lighting devices.
(5) Each guest room shall have one primary and at least one
secondary means of egress. Any window with an area of at least five and
seven-tenths square feet qualifies as a secondary means of egress if such
window is located on either the first or second floor. Any guest rooms
located on a floor with a sprinkler system covering guest rooms and
common areas, excluding bathrooms and closet areas, is exempt from the
requirement of a secondary means of egress.
(6) Each bed and breakfast establishment has eighteen months from
the effective date of this act to install (a) a secondary means of egress
from the bed and breakfast establishment or (b) a sprinkler system.
(7) At least one fire extinguisher with a 2A:10BC rating or higher
shall be provided on each floor of an existing bed and breakfast
establishment. At least one 40BC rated fire extinguisher shall be
provided in the kitchen area.
(8) A bed and breakfast establishment that accommodates more than
ten guests at any time and that serves hot meals shall equip its kitchen
with a fire suppression hood.
Sec. 5. Original sections 81-2,242, 81-2,292, and 81-503.01,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-